Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-203
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention Act, the definitions found in the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act apply.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1903;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 65.

Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act, see section 86-101.